Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-101 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

HB3380 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fostering the
Future for Oklahoman Children and Families Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-102 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall, within one hundred
eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act:
1. Update applicable regulations, policies, and practices to
improve the collection, publication, utility, and transparency of
child-welfare data, including by improving collection of data and
information indicative of child well-being and safety, eliminating
duplicative or unnecessary high-cost and low-value reporting
requirements, and expanding and expediting child-welfare data
publication;
2. Promote modernization of child-welfare information systems
and use of the most effective foster care management and outcome-
tracking platforms;
3. Expand use of technological solutions, including predictive
analytics and tools powered by artificial intelligence, to increase
caregiver recruitment and retention rates, improve caregiver and
child matching, and deploy child-welfare funding to maximally
effective purposes and recipients. Predictive analytics and
artificial intelligence tools may be used through pilot or

HB3380 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

demo nstration programs with appropriate privacy and bias safeguards;
and
4. Publish annually a scorecard that measures and is used to
evaluate achievement of key outcomes and metrics that reduce
unnecessary entries into foster care, decrease the time between
reports of child maltreatment and investigations, reduce child
injuries and fatalities caused by caregiver neglect and abuse,
increase caregiver recruitment and retention, improve caregiver and
child matching, reduce placement disruptions, decrease the average
time that children spend in foster care, accelerate permanent
placement for children, and increase partnerships and collaboration
with appropriate nongovernmental entities, including faith-based
organizations.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-103 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services, in coordination with heads of
other relevant executive departments and agencies shall, within one
hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act:
1. Establish a "Fostering the Future" initiative to develop
partnerships with agencies and leading private sector organizations,
academic institutions, and nonprofit entities to create new
educational and employment opportunities for individuals who are in
or are transitioning out of the foster care system;
HB3380 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Develop a plan to launch a "Fostering the Future" online
platform to help individuals who have been in foster care by
assessing their current needs, providing guidance regarding
accessing federal, state, and local programs and services for which
they are eligible, including housing, education, employment, health
care, and mentoring services offering a searchable database of those
and other available resources, and generating customized plans that
support their self-sufficiency and success;
3. Develop a strategy to reallocate excess funds designed to
assist individuals transitioning out of foster care so that such
funds are used to promote educational success, occupational
advancement, and financial literacy and self-sufficiency for
individuals transitioning out of foster care. Provided, however,
that the reallocation of funds applies only to unexpended or
returned funds and remains subject to legislative appropriation
authority;
4. Facilitate, in coordination with the Oklahoma State
Treasurer, the Oklahoma State Department of Education, and the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, use of educational
scholarships created through tax-credited donations to scholarship-
granting organizations for children in foster care; and
5. Increase flexibility in state-administered education and
training assistance for individuals transitioning out of foster
care, including short-term, career-focused, credential-awarding, and
HB3380 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

work force aligned programs, consistent with federal law and subject
to available funds.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-104 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall:
1. Take appropriate action to address state and local policies
and practices that inappropriately prohibit participation in
federally-funded child-welfare programs by qualified individuals or
organizations based upon their sincerely-held religious beliefs or
moral convictions; and
2. Take appropriate action to increase partnerships between
agencies and faith-based organizations and houses of worship to
serve families whose children have been placed in foster care or are
at risk of being placed in foster care.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-105 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair or
otherwise affect:
1. The authority granted by law to an executive department or
agency, or the head thereof; or


HB3380 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. The functions of the Director of the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services relating to budgetary, administrative, or
legislative proposals.
B. This act shall be implemented consistent with applicable law
and subject to the availability of appropriations.
C. This act is not intended to, and does not, create any right
or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law or in
equity by any party against the State of Oklahoma, its departments,
agencies, or entities, its officers, employees, agents, or any other
person.
D. Participation, pursuant to this act, shall not confer
preferential treatment and shall not exempt any provider from
licensing or safety requirements.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-11-106 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall submit an annual
implementation report to the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma
Senate and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representative.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.


HB3380 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.